Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1040
School funds; apportionment; county treasurer; no compensation allowed.

County treasurers shall not charge for receiving and disbursing the school apportionment.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XI, § 8, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 6935;

C.S.1922, § 6518;

C.S.1929, § 79-2007;

R.S.1943, § 79-2007;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 382, p. 820;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1307;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 686.